California statutes. Public Resources Code
 storm events. A local trustee may rely on appropriate maps generated by other entities. 

(3) An estimate of the financial cost of the impact of sea level rise on granted public trust lands. The estimate shall consider, but is not limited to, the potential cost of repair of damage to and the value of lost use of improvements and land, and the anticipated cost to prevent or mitigate potential damage. 

(4) A description of how the local trustee proposes to protect and preserve natural and manmade resources and facilities located, or proposed to be located, on trust lands and operated in connection with the use of the trust lands. The description shall include, but is not limited to, how wetlands restoration and habitat
 preservation would mitigate impacts of sea level rise.

(e) In addressing the impacts of sea level rise, a local trustee shall collaborate with its lessees, appropriate local, state, and federal agencies, and other users of the granted public trust lands. 

(f) (1) A local trustee that prepares an assessment pursuant to subdivision (c) shall submit a copy to the commission in hard copy and electronic form. The commission shall make the assessment available to the public on its Internet Web site and, for informational purposes, shall send an electronic copy to each member of
 the Climate Action Team, the climate change program manager in the office of the Secretary for Environmental Protection, and the Governor’s Office of Planning and Research. 

(2) For purposes of compliance with this subdivision, if a trustee
 has already completed an assessment of the impacts of sea level rise that meets the criteria of this section, the trustee may submit that assessment to the commission.

(g) The commission shall exempt a local trustee of granted public trust lands from this section if the commission finds either of the following: 

(1) The local trustee’s public trust lands are not subject to sea level rise by 2100, based upon the highest projections in the most recent version of the State of California Sea-Level Rise Guidance Document. 

(2) The cost to provide an assessment of how the local trustee proposes to address the impacts of sea level rise substantially outweighs the benefit the action would have in preventing the potential
 economic and environmental harms associated with sea level rise on the local trustee’s granted public trust lands. In making this determination, the economic benefits of all ecological services provided by the existing natural resources in the local trustee’s granted public trust lands shall be considered.

(h) The commission shall exempt a local trustee from this section if the revenues derived from its granted public trust lands and assets subject to subdivision (c) of Section 6306 or funding made available to it from other discretionary sources is not sufficient to pay for the cost of assessing the impacts of sea level rise on granted public trust land and providing this information to the commission.

(i) The commission shall consider a local trustee’s request for an exemption
 pursuant to subdivision (g) or (h) at a properly noticed commission meeting if the request is made before November 1, 2018. 

(j) Other than submission of the assessment required by subdivision (c), this section does not require a local trustee to implement any specific actions to address sea level rise pursuant to this section. 

(k) Nothing in this section shall be construed to conflict with any federal regulations governing sea level rise.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 592, Sec. 2.   (AB 691)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6312.

Neither the state, nor any political subdivision thereof, shall take possession of lawful improvements on validly granted or patented tidelands or submerged lands without the tender of a fair and just compensation for such lawful improvements as may have been made in good faith by the grantee or patentee or his successors in interest pursuant to any express or implied license contained in the grant or patent.

Nothing herein contained shall be deemed to prevent the parties to a grant or patent of tidelands from agreeing, as a part of such grant or patent, that there shall be no compensation paid for any improvement made on those tidelands to which such agreement relates.

Nothing herein contained is intended to increase, diminish, or affect the title of any person in any validly granted or patented tidelands or submerged lands.

This section shall not be construed to require compensation for any change in the use of tidelands or submerged lands as a result of governmental regulation that prohibits, restricts, delays, or otherwise affects the construction of any planned or contemplated improvement.

As used in this section, the term “grant” or “granted” shall not be construed to apply to legislative grants in trust to local governmental entities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1191.)
-------------------------------------------

6313.

(a) The title to all abandoned shipwrecks and all archaeological sites and historic resources on or in the tide and submerged lands of California is vested in the state. All abandoned shipwrecks and all submerged archaeological sites and submerged historic resources of the state shall be in the custody and subject to the control of the commission for the benefit of the people of the state of California. The commission may transfer title, custody, or control to other state agencies or recognized scientific or educational organizations, institutions, or individuals by appropriate legal conveyance.

(b) As used in this section, “submerged archaeological site” and “submerged historic resource,” shall be given the broadest possible meaning, to include any submerged object, structure, building, watercraft, aircraft, or vessel and any associated cargo, armament, tackle, fixture, human remains, or remnant of those objects, or a site, area, person, or place, which is historically or archaeologically significant, or significant in the prehistory or history or exploration, settlement, engineering, commerce, militarism, recreation, or culture of California and that is partially or wholly embedded in or resting on state submerged or tidal lands.

(c) Sites with archaeological or historic significance shall be determined by reference to their eligibility for inclusion in the National Register of Historic Places or the California Register of Historical Resources. Any submerged archaeological site or submerged historic resource remaining in state waters for more than 50 years shall be presumed to be archaeologically or historically significant. The commission, with the assistance of the State Office of Historic Preservation, shall identify, compile, and maintain an inventory of shipwreck sites, or sites of archaeological or historical significance and shall make the listing available to the public.

(d) Permits for salvage operations involving submerged archaeological sites or submerged historic resources may be granted by the commission when the proposed activity is justified by an educational, scientific, or cultural purpose, or the need to protect the integrity of the site or the resource. The commission may issue permits to individuals or organizations representing museums, universities, colleges, or other recognized scientific or educational institutions and individuals that demonstrate the capability to properly carry out archaeological investigations. The commission may deny an application for a permit to an applicant who the commission determines has not demonstrated the ability to properly conduct an archaeological investigation or salvage activities. The commission may consider the applicant’s past conduct with regard to salvage operations when making this determination.

(e) (1) Prior to the issuance of a permit under subdivision (d), the applicant shall provide to the commission a detailed project design that includes all of the following:

(A) The purpose of the project.

(B) A description of the methodology, technology, and equipment to be employed.

(C) The project funding source.

(D) A timetable for the completion of the project.

(E) The composition, qualifications, and responsibilities of the project team.

(F) A conservation and curation plan, if applicable.

(G) A plan to document all phases of the project.

(H) A safety plan.

(I) An outline and timetable for preparation and submission of progress reports and a final report.

(J) Other information that the commission deems necessary to properly evaluate the application.

(2) All activities permitted under subdivision (d) or required by this subdivision shall be accomplished under the direct supervision of a person who meets the qualifications required of a professional marine archaeologist.

(f) The commission shall forward applications for permits for archaeological investigation or excavation and recovery of historic vessels, aircraft, or other submerged historic resources in state waters, including the information required by subdivision (e), to the State Office of Historic Preservation, and may provide the applications and information to other qualified organizations and individuals, as appropriate, for technical review of the project design and recommendation concerning the preservation and protection of the site or resource.

(g) The commission shall provide for the disposition of all objects or other materials recovered, which may include provisions for display in museums, educational institutions, and other appropriate locations available to the public.

(h) The commission may contract with persons, firms, corporations, or institutions who, for the privilege of having temporary possession of recovered archaeological resources, will advance to the commission the money necessary to conduct salvage operations or to purchase from a permitholder, from his or her fair share, archaeological resources which the commission determines should remain the property of the state. A contract may be made only on the condition that the commission may, at any time, repay the money advanced, without interest or additional charges of any kind, and recover possession of the resources. During the time the resources are in the possession of the entity advancing the money, the resources shall be available for viewing by the general public at a nominal fee or without charge.

(i) The commission may also contract with other state agencies, qualified public or private institutions, local governments, or individuals for public display of the archaeological resources recovered. The commission shall require assurances that appropriate security, qualified personnel, insurance, and facilities for preservation, restoration, and display of the resources loaned are provided under the contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 135, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

6314.

(a) A person who removes, without authorization from the commission, or a person who destroys or damages an archaeological site or a historic resource, that is located on or in the submerged lands of, and that is the property of, the state, is guilty of a misdemeanor, which shall be punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not to exceed six months or a fine not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000), or by both.

(b) The commission, or, at its request, the Attorney General or a district attorney in whose jurisdiction the violation occurred, may seek civil damages for the damage, loss, or destruction of an abandoned shipwreck, its gear or cargo, or an archaeological site or historic resource located on or in submerged lands of the state. A vessel used to damage, destroy, or cause the loss of, any shipwreck or archaeological site or historic resource is subject to a proceeding in rem by the state for the costs and damages resulting from that damage, destruction, or loss. Enforcement may include, where appropriate, a restraining order or injunctive relief to restrain and enjoin violations or threatened violations of Section 6309, Section 6313, or this section and for the return of items taken in violation of these sections.

(c) An artifact, object, or material that has been removed from a state submerged archaeological site or submerged historic resource, as specified in subdivision (a), and that is found in any watercraft occupied by persons who do not hold a permit as required by Section 6309 or 6313 or other reasonable evidence of legal possession is prima facie evidence of a violation of that section and the artifact, object, or material may be confiscated by a state, federal, or local law enforcement officer. An artifact, an object, or material confiscated pursuant to this section shall be returned to the person claiming ownership, upon proof of ownership or legal right to possession, within 30 days of its confiscation, unless a prosecuting attorney determines that it is required as evidence in the prosecution of a criminal violation.

(d) In a case in which a district attorney, at the request of the commission, or with its concurrence, enforces subdivision (a), the commission shall, notwithstanding Section 1463 of the Penal Code, be entitled to an equal division of the fine imposed.

(e) All state and local law enforcement agencies and officers are directed to assist in enforcing this section, and are requested to work with and seek the cooperation of federal law enforcement agencies, including deputizing federal officers when appropriate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 130, Sec. 203.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Control of Structures [6321. - 6327.]

6321.

The commission may, upon written application of the littoral owner, grant authority to any such owner to construct, alter or maintain, groins, jetties, sea walls, breakwaters, and bulkheads, or any one or more such structures, upon, across or over any of the swamp, overflowed, marsh, tide or submerged lands of this state bordering upon such littoral lands if, at the time of construction or alteration, such structures do not unreasonably interfere with the uses and purposes reserved to the people of the state. Except as provided in Section 18930 of the Health and Safety Code, the commission shall make reasonable rules with reference to such applications and the location, type, character, design, size, and manner under which such structures may be constructed, altered or maintained, and shall take suitable measures to enforce such rules and building standards published in the State Building Standards Code. It shall fix and collect reasonable fees, not exceeding the actual cost, for the filing and examination of each such application, and for the performance of such other duties as may be required under the provisions of this chapter.

Notwithstanding anything in this article, no such fees for the filing and examination of applications shall be required of, nor collected from the United States or any agency thereof, or from the state, its agencies or political subdivisions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1152.)
-------------------------------------------

6321.2.

In addition to the fees provided in Section 6321, the commission may fix and collect reasonable charges or rentals for the use of lands upon which any of the structures authorized under Section 6321 are situated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 1241.)
-------------------------------------------

6322.

The commission may also remove or require to be removed, repaired or altered, and may regulate the type, character, design, size, and maintenance of, such structures existing on August 14, 1931, and, except as provided in Section 18930 of the Health and Safety Code, may make reasonable rules in reference thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1152.)
-------------------------------------------

6323.

If accretions are caused or occasioned by any such structure authorized hereunder, no fence, building or other structure of any kind, other than the structure so authorized and appliances for the protection of life and public recreation, shall be permitted or suffered to be erected or maintained either by the State or by any political subdivision or municipality, or by any one claiming under or through them, upon any such accretions belonging to others than the littoral owner, to the end that all such accretions shall at all times be and remain an unobstructed and open beach, except as provided in Article 3 of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1949, Ch. 433.)
-------------------------------------------

6324.

If by reason of any grant to any municipality, political subdivision, or district, or by reason of any charter of any city or county, any of the powers and duties which are granted to or imposed upon the commission in relation to lands described in this article can not be exercised by the commission within any municipality, political subdivision, or district, or any portion thereof, then such powers and duties are to that extent granted to and imposed upon such municipality, political subdivision or district, to be exercised and performed by, or under the authority of, the legislative or other governing body thereof, but where any such lands have been granted to any municipality or other governmental agency in trust or for limited purposes or upon conditions, nothing in this chapter shall affect or extend such trusts or purposes or modify or affect such conditions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 548.)
-------------------------------------------

6325.

The authority granted under this chapter does not obviate the necessity for the applicant to obtain permisssion from the proper federal agencies to construct, alter, or maintain the structures herein authorized.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 607.)
-------------------------------------------

6326.

Nothing in this chapter abridges any right of the State to erect, maintain, or remove the protective structures herein mentioned, upon, across, or over any of the swamp, overflowed, marsh, tide or submerged lands of this State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 548.)
-------------------------------------------

6327.

The commission may, upon written application, grant a permit for the use and occupancy of state lands under the jurisdiction of the commission for the installation of facilities for procurement of fresh-water from and construction of drainage facilities into navigable rivers, streams, lakes and bays, except that if such applicant obtain the required permit for such use from the local reclamation district, the Reclamation Board, the Department of Water Resources, the California Debris Commission or the Corps of Engineers of the United States Army, then such application shall not be required by the State Lands Commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.5. Survey and Mapping of Ungranted Tide and Submerged Lands [6331. - 6342.]

6331.

As used in this article:

(a) “Ungranted tidelands” means the tide and submerged lands owned by the State of California which have not been granted in trust to any local agency or to the United States or to private parties.

(b) “Local agency” means any county, city, public district, or other public agency.

(c) “Person” means any private person, partnership, association, limited liability company, or corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1010, Sec. 211.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

6331.5.

The commission shall make an inventory to ascertain and describe by metes and bounds the location and extent of all ungranted tidelands. The commission shall, in a local agency where the ungranted tideland boundary is described by metes and bounds, acquire and evaluate the existing boundary description to determine whether or not additional surveys should be conducted. When available, the local agency shall provide copies of the descriptions, together with all materials supporting the descriptions, including field notes and other basic data, to the commission at no cost, other than the reproduction cost, to the state.

No appropriation is made by the act adding this section, nor is an obligation created thereby, for the
 reimbursement of a local agency for costs, other than reproduction costs, that may be incurred by it in carrying on a program or performing a service required to be carried on or performed by it by this section. Reimbursements for reproduction expenditures shall be made by the commission from appropriations to the commission for the preparation of the inventory.

The commission shall evaluate each survey and shall adopt boundary descriptions already in common use where these metes and bounds descriptions approximate the existing line of ordinary high water where it is in a state of nature, or where the descriptions approximate the last position occupied in a state of nature by the line of ordinary high water in areas where the existing shoreline has ceased to be in a state of nature, and where sound engineering practices were used to conduct the survey. If metes and bounds descriptions of tideland boundaries are not available, or if the surveys do not describe the
 tideland boundary in a state of nature as hereinbefore defined, or if unsound engineering practices were used to describe a tideland boundary, the commission may conduct its own survey. Unless otherwise provided by law, prior to undertaking a survey on ungranted tidelands, the commission shall prepare an inventory of those ungranted tidelands that will require a commission survey.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 728, Sec. 148.   (SB 71)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

6332.

The commission shall:

(a) Adopt and enforce such rules and regulations as may be necessary or convenient to carry out the purposes of this article in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, in accordance with the following requirements:

(1) All data such as survey notes and factual and historical materials which have been obtained by investigation and survey and considered in connection with the establishment of each ungranted tideland parcel boundary shall be perpetuated, filed, indexed, and made available in the office of the commission for public inspection and use upon request.

(2) Surveys of ungranted tideland boundary lines made by the state, or made under contract with the state, or adopted by the state, shall sufficiently tie the surveyed boundary lines to record monuments disclosed by the public records in the office of the county recorder of the county in which the land so surveyed is located to the extent that adjoining property owners and officials of the local agency and others may determine the relation of the surveyed boundary lines to record title boundaries without additional survey.

(3) United States Coast and Geodetic Survey data shall be used in areas where available to establish boundary lines which are required under the title circumstances to be established in accordance with federal law. In areas where tideland boundary lines are required to be established under title circumstances which require the application of California law, available United States Coast and Geodetic Survey data shall be used but corrected as required. Consideration shall be given in each survey to any seiche condition which may exist in the surveyed area.

(4) Consideration shall be given to the effect of any prior accretion and erosion in each surveyed area. Consideration shall also be given to the confirmation of title boundaries of lands claimed to be in private or public ownership, which lands support improvements of long standing authorized by governmental action.

(5) Boundary lines so established and surveyed shall take into consideration any statutes of limitations applicable to the validity of patents, and the finality of boundary line agreements and boundary and exchange agreements adopted prior to, or on or after, January 1, 1976, and whether entered into pursuant to Section 6307 or 6357, or any other statutes of this state, or otherwise.

(6) When establishing and surveying the line of ordinary high water, the then existing location of that line shall be used unless there is clear and convincing evidence that that location is not the last natural position of the line according to applicable federal or state laws.

(b) Contract with all agencies, public and private, as the commission may deem necessary for the rendition and affording of services and facilities to the commission pursuant to this article and for all other purposes related thereto.

(c) Do all other acts necessary to carry out the requirements and purposes of this article within the limit of its authority conferred by law, including this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 714, Sec. 365.)
-------------------------------------------

6333.

The commission shall prepare and adopt, on or before March 31, 1989, a “Preliminary Map of Ungranted Tideland Boundaries in California” based on the inventory and survey required by this article and shall on or before that date:

(a) Transmit a copy of such “Preliminary Map of Ungranted Tideland Boundaries in California” to the Secretary of the Senate, the Chief Clerk of the Assembly, the Attorney General, and the State Librarian.

(b) Transmit a copy of the pertinent part of such “Preliminary Map of Ungranted Tideland Boundaries in California” relating to each county wherein ungranted tidelands are located to the county clerk thereof, who shall thereupon post the same in a public place in his office.

(c) Publish a notice in accordance with Section 6066 of the Government Code between April 1 and April 30, 1989, in a newspaper of general circulation within each county wherein ungranted tidelands are located, announcing that a copy of such “Preliminary Map of Ungranted Tideland Boundaries in California” is available for public inspection at the office of the county clerk of such county during the business hours of such office, and post a similar notice in three public places in such county.

(d) Make available copies of each such “Preliminary Map of Ungranted Tideland Boundaries in California,” or pertinent parts thereof, to the public at the approximate cost of reproduction.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, the commission may prepare and adopt such “Preliminary Map of Ungranted Tideland Boundaries in California” in segments of the whole, whether by individual parcels or by areas. Any reference to a particular “Preliminary Map of Ungranted Tideland Boundaries in California” shall be deemed to refer to such parcels or areas. Nothing in this article shall preclude the preparation of such “Preliminary Map of Ungranted Tideland Boundaries in California” in segments or as a whole prior to an inventory being made pursuant to Section 6331.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 706.)
-------------------------------------------

6334.

After completing the “Preliminary Map of Ungranted Tideland Boundaries in California,” the commission shall adopt and prepare a “Preliminary Description of Ungranted Tideland Boundaries” for each parcel of ungranted tidelands inventoried pursuant to this article, which shall be completed on or before June 30, 1989. The commission thereafter shall:

(a) Transmit a copy of each such “Preliminary Description of Ungranted Tideland Boundaries” for each parcel of ungranted tidelands to the office of the county clerk of the county in which each such parcel is located, who shall thereupon post the same in a public place in his office.

(b) Publish a notice in accordance with Section 6066 of the Government Code, between July 1 and July 31, 1989, in a newspaper of general circulation within each such county, announcing that a copy of the “Preliminary Description of Ungranted Tideland Boundaries” for each parcel of ungranted tidelands located within the county is available for public inspection at the office of the county clerk during the business hours of such office, and post a similar notice in three public places in such county.

(c) Copies of each such “Preliminary Description of Ungranted Tideland Boundaries” shall be made available by the commission to the public at the approximate cost of reproduction.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this article, the commission may prepare and adopt such “Preliminary Description of Ungranted Tideland Boundaries” in segments of the whole whether by individual parcels or by areas. Any reference to a particular “Preliminary Description of Ungranted Tideland Boundaries” shall be deemed to refer to such parcels or areas. Nothing in this article shall preclude the preparation of such “Preliminary Description of Ungranted Tideland Boundaries” in segments or as a whole prior to an inventory being made pursuant to Section 6331.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 706.)
-------------------------------------------

6335.

On or before December 31, 1989, any local agency or other interested person affected by boundaries described by the “Preliminary Description of Ungranted Tideland Boundaries” may file a protest, verified under oath, on a form to be prescribed and provided by the commission, at an office of the commission. Any such protest shall be accompanied by a list or brief summary of all data and pertinent evidence bearing upon the protest upon which the protesting party intends to rely and which is in the possession of the protesting party at the time of the filing of the protest. A protesting party may, at least 10 days prior to the hearing or continued hearing provided for in Section 6337, or at any time as the commission may approve, submit a list or brief summary of any such data and pertinent evidence obtained subsequent to the filing of the protest. Any such data and pertinent evidence shall, upon request of the commission, be available for inspection amd reproduction by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 706.)
-------------------------------------------

6336.

The commission may negotiate with any person or local agency having or claiming an interest in any land affected by boundaries described by the “Preliminary Description of Ungranted Tideland Boundaries,” for the purpose of reaching a boundary agreement. Any such boundary agreement shall be binding on the state and other parties thereto when approved by the commission. Any such boundary agreement shall be recorded in the office of the county recorder of each county in which the land affected thereby, or some portion thereof, is located. The boundary line so established shall be incorporated in, and made a part of, the master map and description to be prepared pursuant to the provisions of Section 6338.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1079.)
-------------------------------------------

6337.

Before adopting the Master Map of Ungranted Tideland Boundaries in California and a Description of Ungranted Tideland Boundaries pursuant to Section 6338, the commission shall consider all evidence submitted pursuant to Section 6335. The commission may, in its discretion, and shall, upon the request of the protestant, hold a hearing as to any protest or protests prior to adopting the master map and description. The commission may authorize its executive officer or other officer or employee of the commission to conduct such hearing or hearings at a convenient location selected by the commission within each county where such protested boundary is located. Not less than 30 days before the date set for each hearing, a notice, setting forth the time, place, and nature of such hearing, shall be sent by such officer or employee by certified mail to each protestant whose protest is to be heard at such hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 706.)
-------------------------------------------

6338.

On or before December 31, 1992, the commission shall prepare, certify, adopt, and publish in final form a “Master Map of Ungranted Tideland Boundaries in California,” and a “Description of Ungranted Tideland Boundaries” for each parcel of ungranted tidelands, either in whole, or by segments as completed, and thereafter shall:

(a) File a copy of each of the aforementioned documents with the Chief Clerk of the Assembly, the Secretary of the Senate, the Attorney General, the Director of Finance, the Director of Conservation, the Director of Parks and Recreation, the State Librarian, and such other state departments or agencies as the commission may deem advisable.

(b) Record one copy of the part of each such document pertaining to the county affected in the office of the county recorder of each county in which ungranted tidelands are located.

(c) File the original of each in the official file of the commission as a public record.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 706.)
-------------------------------------------

6339.

(a) Boundaries established by boundary agreements entered into and recorded pursuant to Section 6336, as to all parties thereto, shall be fixed and permanent without change by reason of fluctuation due to the forces of nature, except that any lands that may thereafter be submerged or become subject to the ebb and flow of the tide, shall, so long as such conditions exist, be subject to the easement in favor of the public for commerce, navigation, and fisheries.

(b) Boundaries mapped and described pursuant to this article, other than boundaries established by parties to a boundary agreement entered into pursuant to Section 6336, shall not be binding upon any upland owner or other party affected thereby, whose rights, if any, shall not be affected by any provision of this article. If any such rights have been previously determined pursuant to law, they shall remain unaffected by the provisions of, and proceedings undertaken pursuant to, this article. If any such rights have not been previously determined, they may be determined pursuant to any law existing as of January 1, 1976, or that may be thereafter enacted. However, any such upland owner or other person affected by the master map and description may consent in writing to bind his land or any claimed title or interest therein to the boundaries so mapped and described. Such consent shall be acknowledged by the party executing it and shall be recorded in the office of the county recorder of the county in which the land affected thereby is located. The consent shall thereafter have the same effect as if a boundary agreement had been entered into pursuant to Section 6336, and the provisions of subdivision (a) of this section shall be applicable thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 706.)
-------------------------------------------

6340.

The inventory required by this article shall not extend to, or have any bearing upon, the determination of the seaward boundary separating lands belonging to the state and lands belonging to the United States.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 706.)
-------------------------------------------

6341.

Any boundary line agreement entered into pursuant to Section 6336 or 6357, or any consent recorded pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 6339, or any exchange of land made pursuant to Section 6307, shall be conclusively presumed to be valid unless held to be invalid in an appropriate proceeding in a court of competent jurisdiction to determine the validity of such boundary line agreement or consent or exchange commenced prior to January 1, 1977, or within one year after the execution and recording of such boundary line agreement or such consent or exchange, whichever is later.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 706.)
-------------------------------------------

6342.

The commission may enter into boundary line agreements with any person or public entity, describing and defining the boundary line between ungranted tidelands and adjacent uplands owned by such person or public entity. Such boundary line agreements shall be executed on behalf of the commission, and upon recordation shall be binding and conclusive as between the state and all persons and public entities executing such agreements, and the provisions of subdivision (a) of Section 6339 shall be applicable thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 706.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Procedure on Establishment of Ordinary High-Water and Low-Water Mark [6357. - 6360.]

6357.

The commission may establish the ordinary high-water mark or the ordinary low-water mark of any of the swamp, overflowed, marsh, tide, or submerged lands of this State, by agreement, arbitration, or action to quiet title, whenever it is deemed expedient or necessary. The amendment hereby made is declaratory of the existing law and any such agreements heretofore made establishing the ordinary high-water mark or the ordinary low-water mark of any of the swamp, overflowed, marsh, tide, or submerged lands of this State hereby are ratified and confirmed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 394.)
-------------------------------------------

6358.

On receipt of a request from the legislative body of a county, city, or other political subdivision or agency of the State, to which a legislative grant of tide and submerged lands has been or may be made, or at its own instigation, the commission may survey, monument, plat, and record in the office of the recorder in the county or counties in which such lands are located, the area of state lands described in such act of the Legislature. Whenever such survey and plat has been made at the request of a grantee of the State, the costs thereof shall be repaid by such grantee to the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 977.)
-------------------------------------------

6359.

Whenever by legislative enactment tide or submerged lands of the State are granted or conveyed or authorized to be granted or conveyed or whenever a previous enactment is amended, and no prior survey has been made, and such act does not contain a description of such lands by metes and bounds, the commission shall within two years following the effective date of such act survey, monument, and record a plat and a metes and bounds description of such lands in the office of the county recorder in the county or counties in which such lands are located. Upon recordation, the survey, monuments, plat and description shall be binding upon the State, the grantee, and their successors in interest.

No such grant or conveyance or amended grant or conveyance shall be effective until completion of the survey and recordation. The cost of such survey and recordation shall be paid by the person or entity to which the grant or conveyance is made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1711.)
-------------------------------------------

6360.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the boundary line of land lying within the Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta (as defined in Section 12220 of the Water Code) bordering upon tidal waters or upon a navigable stream is, for the purpose of determining boundary location, conclusively presumed to be located at the ordinary high-water mark when such land borders on tidal lands not validly patented into private ownership and at the low-water mark when such land borders upon a navigable stream where there is no tide or where such lands consist of tidelands validly patented into private ownership, as such high- or low-water mark exists upon the effective date of this section and from time to time thereafter where, for a period of not less than 30 years continuously, prior to the effective date of this section, the following facts exist:
